Utah statutes.
70A-9a-602.   Waiver and variance of rights and duties.
Except as otherwise provided in Section 70A-9a-624, to the extent that they
give rights to a debtor or obligor and impose duties on a secured party, the
debtor or obligor may not waive or vary the rules stated in the following
listed sections:
(1)  Subsection 70A-9a-207(2)(d)(iii), which deals with use and operation of
the collateral by the secured party;
(2)  Section 70A-9a-210, which deals with requests for an accounting and
requests concerning a list of collateral and statement of account;
(3)  Subsection 70A-9a-607(3), which deals with collection and enforcement of
collateral;
(4)  Subsections 70A-9a-608(1) and 70A-9a-615(3) to the extent that they deal
with application or payment of noncash proceeds of collection, enforcement, or
disposition;
(5)  Subsections 70A-9a-608(1) and 70A-9a-615(4) to the extent that they
require accounting for or payment of surplus proceeds of collateral;
(6)  Section 70A-9a-609 to the extent that it imposes upon a secured party
that takes possession of collateral without judicial process the duty to do so
without breach of the peace;
(7)  Subsection 70A-9a-610(2) and Sections 70A-9a-611, 70A-9a-613, and 70A-
9a-614, which deal with disposition of collateral;
(8)  Subsection 70A-9a-615(6), which deals with calculation of a deficiency or
surplus when a disposition is made to the secured party, a person related to
the secured party, or a secondary obligor;
(9)  Section 70A-9a-616, which deals with explanation of the calculation of a
surplus or deficiency;
(10)  Sections 70A-9a-620, 70A-9a-621, and 70A-9a-622, which deal with
acceptance of collateral in satisfaction of obligation;
(11)  Section 70A-9a-623, which deals with redemption of collateral;
(12)  Section 70A-9a-624, which deals with permissible waivers; and
(13)  Sections 70A-9a-625 and 70A-9a-626, which deal with the secured party's
liability for failure to comply with this chapter.
